src/fst/morphology/stems/conjunctions.lexc
!! Conjunctions
!  ------------
!! Conjunctions in Klingon join sentences or nouns.

LEXICON Conjunctions
je+Conj:je      #   ;
joq+Conj:joq    #   ;
ghap+Conj:ghap  #   ;
’ej+Conj:’ej    #   ;
qoj+Conj:qoj    #   ;
pagh+Conj:pagh  #   ;
’ach+Conj:’ach  #   ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
